Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 1

General Provisions

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, No. 1265, § 12: Apr. 8, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is an alarming lack of transparency in the corrections system regarding information about inmates who will soon be coming up for parole and released into society; that it is vital to public safety that the public know exactly what potential threats exist from inmates in the Department of Correction who will soon be introduced back into society; and that this act is immediately necessary because the sooner inmate, parolee, and probationer information is made available to the public, the sooner the public is able to evaluate who is and who is not a threat to society. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the publicpeace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

12-1-101. Recidivism reporting — Definition.

As used in this section, “recidivism” means a criminal act that results in the rearrest, reconviction, or return to incarceration of a person with or without a new sentence during a three-year period following the person's release from custody.

An entity that makes a recidivism report under this title shall use the definition of recidivism in this section for purposes of the recidivism report.

Population projections;

Recidivism; and

Evaluation of the cost-benefit of evidence-based practices of:

Adult prisons;

Community corrections facilities;

Probation; and

Parole.

Data posted on the board's, the Division of Correction’s, or the Division of Community Correction’s websites under this section may be removed from the board's, the Division of Correction’s, or the Division of Community Correction’s websites after five (5) years.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction”and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” throughout the section.

[Reserved.]

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 250, § 63. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

12-6-101. Acts 1983, No. 549, § 16; 1985, No. 143, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 75-2514.

12-6-102. Acts 1983, No. 549, § 16; 1985, No. 143, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 75-2514.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter was repealed by Acts 1991, Nos. 727 and 828, § 5. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

12-6-201. Acts 1981, No. 881, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 41-1818.

12-6-202. Acts 1981, No. 881, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 41-1819.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1030, § 2.

12-1-102. Records to be posted on a public website.

Relevant research studies and reports concerning the following topics that are generated by the research divisions of the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, and the Parole Board or by third-party contractors on behalf of the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, and the board, when applicable, shall be posted on the Division of Correction’s, the Division of Community Correction’s, or the board's website:

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1265, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §
699.

Chapters 2-5

[Reserved.]